Maine, session 132, LD2024.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6313, sub-§4, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 155, §5 and
affected by §6, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6313, sub-§4, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. Possesses a valid United States Merchant Mariner Credential issued by the United
States Coast Guard indicating an endorsement authorizing the individual to carry
passengers for hire; or
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6431-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2007, c. 201, §12, is further
amended to read:
1. Limit. Before March 1, 2000, the holder of a Class I, Class II or Class III license
issued under section 6421 may not submerge more than 1,000 traps. After February 29,
2000, the The holder of a Class I, Class II or Class III license or a nonresident lobster and
crab landing permit issued under section 6421 may not submerge more than 800 traps. If
a lower trap limit is adopted by rule for a zone pursuant to section 6446, a license holder
who fishes in that zone may not submerge a number of traps that exceeds the lower limit.
The number of traps fished from a vessel may not exceed the applicable trap limit
established in this subsection, regardless of the number of license holders fishing from that
vessel.
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §6431-A, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 421, Pt. B, §22 and
affected by Pt. C, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §6864, sub-§1-B, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 370, §3, is repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR2626(03)